Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5590HH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2046 Section 1. Section 476.49, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0i. âPortable solar generation deviceâ means 3 a moveable photovoltaic generation device that meets all of the 4 following requirements: 5 (1) Has a maximum power output of not more than one thousand 6 two hundred watts. 7 (2) Is designed to be connected to a buildingâs electrical 8 system through a standard one hundred twenty volt alternating 9 current outlet. 10 (3) Is intended primarily to offset part of the customerâs 11 electricity consumption. 12 (4) Meets the standards of the national electrical code, 13 adopted pursuant to section 103.6. 14 (5) Is certified by the underwriters laboratories or an 15 equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory. 16 (6) Includes a device or feature that prevents the system 17 from energizing the buildingâs electrical system during a power 18 outage. 19 Sec. 2. Section 476.49, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. Portable solar generation devices. 22 a. A portable solar generation device shall not be required 23 to interconnect to the electric distribution system and is not 24 subject to the net metering requirements under this section. 25 b. An electric utility shall not require any of the 26 following from a customer using a portable solar generation 27 device: 28 (1) The electric utilityâs approval before installing or 29 using the system. 30 (2) Any fee or charge related to the system. 31 (3) Any additional controls or equipment beyond what is 32 integrated into the system. 33 c. An electric utility is not liable for any damage or 34 injury caused by a portable solar generation device. 35 -1- LSB 5590HH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2046